New York, session 2025-2026, S6582.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 404-b of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by chapter 277 of the laws of 1991, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 1. Any member of any volunteer fire department or company in this 5 state [or] and the spouse of any such member shall, upon request, be 6 issued a license plate bearing a Maltese cross and the letters "V.F.". 7 [If a distinctive plate is issued to any such member pursuant to this 8 section, such a distinctive plate shall not be issued to the spouse of 9 such member.] Application for [said] such license plate shall be filed 10 with the commissioner in such form and detail as the commissioner shall 11 prescribe, and shall be verified annually by the applicant and the 12 spouse. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01818-01-5